src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Wasco-Wishram language are attatched to the left of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
!nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
@U.GEN.SGa@:@U.GEN.SGa@a%< WAC_PX_NOUN ;
@U.GEN.SGi@:@U.GEN.SGi@i%< WAC_PX_NOUN ;
@U.GEN.PLit@:@U.GEN.PLit@it%< WAC_PX_NOUN ;
@U.GEN.PLid@:@U.GEN.PLid@id%< WAC_PX_NOUN ;

@U.TENSE.PAST4@:@U.TENSE.PAST4@ga%< WAC_PREVERBS_01 ;
 WAC_PREVERBS_01 ;

LEXICON WAC_PREVERBS_01
WAC_PREVERBS_02 ;
LEXICON WAC_PREVERBS_02
WAC_PREVERBS_03 ;
LEXICON WAC_PREVERBS_03
WAC_PREVERBS_04 ;
LEXICON WAC_PREVERBS_04
Verbs ;

LEXICON WAC_PX_NOUN
 Nouns ;
@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@k%< Nouns ;
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@mi%< Nouns ;
@U.PX.SG3C@:@U.PX.SG3C@ƚa%< Nouns ;
@U.PX.SG3F@:@U.PX.SG3F@ga%< Nouns ;
@U.PX.SG3M@:@U.PX.SG3M@ia%< Nouns ;
!@U.PX.DU1@ Nouns ;
!@U.PX.DU2@ Nouns ;
!@U.PX.DU3@ Nouns ;
!@U.PX.PL1INC@ Nouns ;
@U.PX.PL1EXC@:@U.PX.PL1EXC@nsha%< Nouns ;
!@U.PX.PL2@ Nouns ;
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@da%< Nouns ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
